en: saffron milk cap, red pine mushroom
ar: فطر زعفراني حليبي الغطاء
az: Narıncı südləyən
be: Рыжык
bg: обикновена млечница
ca: pinetell, rovellon
co: Lattaghjolu
cs: ryzec pravý
cv: Хыр кăмпи
cy: Cap llaeth saffrwm
de: Edel-Reizker
el: Κουμαρίτες
es: níscalo, níscalos
et: Porgandriisikas
eu: Esnegorri
fa: شیر-زعفران کلاه
fi: Männynleppärousku
fr: Lactaire délicieux
gl: Níscaro
hr: rujnica
hu: Ízletes rizike
it: zafferano latteo
ka: მჭადა სოკო
la: Lactarius deliciosus
lt: Pušyninė rudmėsė
lv: Priežu rudmiese
mk: рујница
nb: Furumatriske
nl: Oranjegroene melkzwam
nn: Furumatriske
pl: Mleczaj rydz, rydz, rydze
ro: Râșcov de brad
ru: Рыжик настоящий
sh: Rujnica
sk: Rýdzik pravý
sl: Užitna sirovka
sv: Tallblodriska
tt: Җирән гөмбә
uk: Рижик смачний
zh: 松乳菇

en: bloody milk cap
ca: rovelló
cs: ryzec krvomléčný
de: Weinroter Kiefern-Reizker
et: Veririisikas
fi: verirousku
fr: Lactaire sanguin
gl: Níscaro de sangue
hr: krvava mliječna kapa
it: latte sanguinante
pl: Mleczaj czerwieniejący
ru: Рыжик красный
sr: Врсовница
sv: Vinriska

en: Lactarius sanguifluus, lactarus sanguifluus
it: lactarius sanguifluus
la: Lactarius sanguifluus

en: sweet toothm wood hedgehog
de: Semmel-Stoppelpilz
fr: pied de mouton
hr: sladokusac šumski jež
it: steccherino dorato (Hydnum repandum)
la: hydnum repandum
nl: gele stekelzwam

en: morel, morels
ar: غوشنة
be: Смаржок
ca: múrgola
cs: smrž
de: Morcheln
el: Μορχέλα
eo: Morkelo
et: Mürkel
eu: Karraspina
fa: کرکونوسه
fi: huhtasieni, huhtasienet
fr: morille, morilles
ga: Morchal
he: גמצוץ
hi: मोर्चेल्ला
hr: smrčci
io: Morelo
it: spugnole
ja: アミガサタケ属
ka: ხარისფაშვა
ko: 곰보버섯속
la: Morchella
lt: Briedžiukas
lv: Lāčpurni
nl: Morielje
pl: Smardz, smardze
qu: Wiksa-wiksa
ro: Zbârciog
ru: Сморчок
sh: Smrčci
sk: smrčok
tt: Җыерчалы гөмбәләр
ur: گچھی

fr: Morilles séchées
de: Morcheln getrocknet
it: spugnole secche

la: Morchella conica
ar: غوشنة مخروطية
be: смаржок канічны
bg: островърха смръчкула
ca: arigany
cs: smrž kuželovitý
de: Spitz-Morchel
et: Kuhikmürkel
fi: Kartiohuhtasieni
he: גמצוץ חרוטי
hu: Hegyes kucsmagomba
mk: конусна смрчка
pl: Smardz stożkowaty
ro: Zbârciog țuguiat
ru: Сморчок конический
sk: smrčok vysoký
sr: Ружичасти смрчак
sv: Toppmurkla
uk: Зморшок конічний
zh: 羊肚菌

en: common morel
ar: غوشنة حلوة
bg: смръчкула
cs: smrž obecný
cy: Morel cyffredin
de: Speise-Morchel
es: Cagarrias
fi: Pallohuhtasieni
fr: morille commune
gl: Cogomelo de coresma
hr: obični smrčak
hu: Ízletes kucsmagomba
it: spugnola comune
ja: アミガサタケ
ko: 곰보버섯
lt: Valgomasis briedžiukas
mk: смрчка
nl: Gewone morielje
pl: Smardz jadalny
qu: Paqu wiksa-wiksa
ro: Zbârciog galben
ru: Сморчок съедобный
sk: smrčok jedlý
sl: Mavrah
sr: Крути смрчак
sv: Rund toppmurkla
tr: Kuzugöbeği
uk: Зморшок їстівний
zh: 美味羊肚菌

en: Enoki mushrooms, enokitake, golden needle mushrooms, velvet shank
la: Flammulina velutipes

en: pepeao, pepeiao, wood ear mushroom
la: Auricularia polytricha

en: maitake mushroom, maitake mushrooms
la: Grifola frondosa

en: chestnut mushroom, pholiota, chestnut mushrooms
be: Лускаўніца
cs: šupinovka
de: Schüpplinge
es: Pholiota
fi: helokka, helokat
fr: pholiote, pholiotes
hr: foliota
hy: Բոցասնկեր
it: fungo Castagna, Pholiota
ja: スギタケ属
la: Pholiota adiposa
lt: Skujagalvė
mk: лушпарка
pl: Łuskwiak
ru: Чешуйчатка
sv: Tofsskivlingar
zh: 鱗傘屬

en: nameko, Pholiota nameko, Pholiota microspora
ar: ناميكو
cs: šupinovka nameko
de: Japanisches Stockschwämmchen, Nameko, Pholiota nameko
es: nameco
fr: Pholiota microspora, Pholiota nameko, Nameko
hr: nameko
it: Nameko
ja: ナメコ
ko: 나도팽나무버섯
la: Pholiota nameko, Pholiota microspora
pl: grzyby nameko
ru: Чешуйчатка съедобная
sv: Namekotofsskivling
zh: 滑菇

en: sheathed woodtuft
bg: Кичуреста пънчушка
cs: opeňka měnlivá
cy: Siobyn coed bacsiog
de: Gemeines Stockschwämmchen
fi: Koivunkantosieni
fr: Pholiote changeante, Souchette, Agaric à soupe
hr: obložen drvetom
hu: Ízletes tőkegomba
is: Hverfisveppur
it: ciuffo di legno inguainato
ja: センボンイチメガサ
ka: ზაფხულის მანჭკვალა
la: Pholiota mutabilis, Kuehneromyces mutabilis
lt: Paprastoji kelmiukė
nl: Stobbezwammetje
pl: łuskwiak zmienny
ro: Gheba ciobanilor
ru: Опёнок летний
sv: Föränderlig tofsskivling
zh: 庫恩菇

en: Suillus
xx: Suillus
pl: maślak, maślaki, Suillus Gray
ua: маслюк

en: velvet bolete, variegated bolete
xx: Suillus variegatus
pl: maślak pstry

en: slippery jack, sticky bun, Suillus luteus
bg: обикновена масловка
ca: pinetell de calceta, Suillus luteus
co: Pinaghjolu, Suillus luteus
cs: klouzek obecný
cy: Boled llithrig, Suillus luteus
de: Butterpilze, Suillus luteus
et: Võitatik, Suillus luteus
fi: Voitatti, Suillus luteus
fr: bolet jaune, bolets jaunes, Suillus luteus, Boletus luteus
gl: Andoa anelada, Suillus luteus
hr: sklizak jack
hu: Barna gyűrűstinóru, Suillus luteus
is: Furusveppur, Suillus luteus
it: Funghi Pinaroli
ja: ヌメリイグチ
la: Suillus luteus
lt: Tikrasis kazlėkas, Suillus luteus
lv: Parastā sviestbeka, Suillus luteus
mn: Эгэл тосондой
nb: Smørsopp, Suillus luteus
nl: bruine boleten, Bruine ringboleet, Suillus luteus
os: Цыргъкъопп зокъо
pl: Maślak zwyczajny, maślaki zwyczajne
ro: Turta vacii, Suillus luteus
ru: Маслёнок обыкновенный
sv: Smörsopp, Suillus luteus
uk: Маслюк звичайний

en: straw mushroom
ca: bolet de la palla
cs: kukmák sklepní
de: Dunkelstreifiger Scheidling
fa: قارچ کاه
fi: Viljelytuppisieni
fr: Volvaire volvacée, Volvaire, Volvaire cultivée, Volvaire asiatique
hi: पुआल मशरूम
hr: slamnata gljiva
id: Jamur merang
it: fungo di paglia
ja: フクロタケ
jv: Jamur merang
la: Volvariella Volvacea, Agaricus volvaceus, Volvaria volvacea, volvaria volvaria
nl: tropische beurszwam
or: ପାଳ ଛତୁ
pl: Pochwiak wielkopochwowy, pochwiak pochwiasty, grzyb słomkowy, grzyby słomkowe
sv: Halmslidskivling
th: เห็ดฟาง
vi: Nấm rơm
zh: 草菇

en: weeping bolete, Suillus granulatus
bg: зърнеста масловка
ca: molleric granellut, Suillus granulatus
cs: klouzek zrnitý, Suillus granulatus
cy: Boled diferol, Suillus granulatus
de: Körnchen-Röhrling, Suillus granulatus
et: Lambatatik, Suillus granulatus
fi: Jyvästatti, Suillus granulatus
fr: Cèpe jaune des pins, Suillus granulatus
he: אורנייה מצויה
hr: plačljivi vrganj
it: boleto piangente
ja: チチアワタケ
ka: დუმასოკო
la: Suillus granulatus
lt: Šilinis kazlėkas, Suillus granulatus
lv: Graudainā sviestbeka, Suillus granulatus
mk: волчјо лепче
pl: Maślak ziarnisty, Suillus granulatus
ro: Pitoașcă, Suillus granulatus
ru: Маслёнок зернистый
sr: Боровњача
sv: Grynsopp, Suillus granulatus
uk: Маслюк зернистий

en: shiitake, lentinula edodes, lentinus edodes, shiitake mushrooms
bg: шийтаке
de: shiitake, schwarzer Pilz, shiitakepilze
es: shiitake, hongo de shiitake, seta shiitake, setas shiitake, seta shiitake cultivada
fi: siitake, lentinula edodes
fr: shiitake, champignon noir, champignons noirs, shiitakes, Lentin du chêne, Lentin comestible, Champignon parfumé, Champignon shiitaké
hr: shiitake
it: shiitake, funghi shiitake
ja: 椎茸, しいたけ
la: Lentinula edodes, lentinus edodes
nl: shiitake, zwarte paddestoel, Chinese champignons, chinese paddenstoel
pl: shiitake, grzyby shiitake, grzybów shiitake
pt: Shiitake
sv: shiitakesvamp, shiitake-svampe, svart champinjon